Arizona, session 57th-2nd-regular, HB2879.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of the State of Arizona: Section 1. Title 12, chapter 13, article 7.1, Arizona Revised Statutes, is amended by adding section 12-2294.02, to read: START_STATUTE12-2294.02. Release of medical records for immigration enforcement; definition A. Notwithstanding any other law, a health care provider may not provide medical records or access to the nonpublic areas of a medical facility for the purposes of immigration enforcement unless one of the following applies: 1. The patient authorizes the release in writing. 2. The health care provider is presented with a valid search warrant that includes the signature of a neutral magistrate of competent jurisdiction. 3. The health care provider is served with a subpoena pursuant to section 12-2294.01. B. For the purposes of this section, "immigration enforcement" means all efforts to investigate, enforce or assist in the investigation or enforcement of any federal civil or criminal immigration law, including any federal criminal immigration law that penalizes a person's presence, employment, entry or reentry in the United States. END_STATUTE